Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Immunities

§ 1661.
Attesting witnesses to wills and other instruments.

The provisions of sections 1601-1609 and 1642 of this title shall not affect the law relating to the attestation of the execution of last wills and testaments or of any other instrument.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1662.
Self incrimination—generally.

The provisions of sections 1601-1609 and 1642 of this title shall not compel a person to subject himself or herself by his or her testimony to a prosecution for a criminal offense.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1663.
Suits or prosecutions for fraudulent conveyances.

When a person testifies in a suit or proceeding at law, his or her testimony shall not be used as evidence to prove any fact in a suit or prosecution against him or her for a penalty for violation of a law in relation to fraudulent conveyance of property.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1664.
Immunity of witnesses.

Whenever a witness refuses, on the basis of his or her privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or provide other information in a proceeding before or ancillary to a court or grand jury of the State of Vermont, and the presiding judge communicates to the witness an order issued under subsection (b) of this section, the witness may not refuse to comply with the order on the basis of his or her privilege against self-incrimination; but no testimony or other information compelled under the order, or any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other information, may be used for any purpose, including impeachment and cross-examination, against the witness in any criminal case, except a prosecution for perjury, giving a false statement, or otherwise failing to comply with the order. The State shall have the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt that any proffered evidence was derived from sources totally independent of the compelled testimony. If the witness is subsequently charged with an offense, other than perjury, the court may order the return of all copies of his or her compelled testimony. Nothing in this section shall preclude the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney from entering into an agreement with a witness, or from requesting an order from the presiding judge under subsection (b) of this section, under which the witness shall not be prosecuted or subject to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she may testify or produce evidence and no testimony given or procured pursuant to such agreement shall be received against him or her in any criminal investigation, proceeding, or trial, except a prosecution for perjury, giving a false statement, or otherwise failing to comply with a court order.

In the case of any individual who has been or may be called to testify or provide other information at any proceeding before or ancillary to a court or grand jury of the State of Vermont, the presiding judge may issue in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, upon the request of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney, an order requiring such individual to give testimony or provide other information which he or she refuses to give or provide on the basis of his or her privilege against self-incrimination, such order to become effective as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may request an order under subsection (a) of this section when in his or her judgment:

the testimony or other information from such individual may be necessary to the public interest; and

such individual has refused or is likely to refuse to testify or provide other information on the basis of his or her privilege against self-incrimination.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 1, 1972;

1973, No. 109

, § 1, eff. July 1, 1973;

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.